Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.560

Police forces for universities and The Evergreen State College—Establishment of traffic regulations—Adjudication of parking infractions—Appeal.

(1) The boards of regents of the state universities, and the boards of trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State College, acting independently and each on behalf of its own institution, may each:

(a) Establish and promulgate rules and regulations governing pedestrian traffic and vehicular traffic and parking upon lands and facilities of the university or college;

(b) Adjudicate matters involving parking infractions internally; and

(c) Collect and retain any penalties so imposed.

(2) If the rules or regulations promulgated under subsection (1) of this section provide for internal adjudication of parking infractions, a person charged with a parking infraction who deems himself or herself aggrieved by the final decision in an internal adjudication may, within ten days after written notice of the final decision, appeal by filing a written notice thereof with the college or university police force. Documents relating to the appeal shall immediately be forwarded to the district court in the county in which the offense was committed, which court shall have jurisdiction over such offense and such appeal shall be heard de novo.

[ 1983 c 221 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 25; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.560. Prior: 1965 ex.s. c 16 s 3; 1949 c 123 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4543-18. Formerly RCW 28.76.330.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.